Oklahoma, session 2025, SB675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 2-124, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-124. A. There is hereby created within the
Department of Public Safety an Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Telecommunication Systems Division.
B. The Division shall:
1. Operate and maintain an on-line online, realtime real-time
computer system and a statewide law enforcement data communication
network;
2. Utilize and distribute information on vehicle registration,
driver records, criminals, and the commission of crimes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB675 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Be responsible for the coordination of user agencies with
the National Crime Information Center in Washington, D.C., and the
National Law Enforcement Telecommunication Telecommunications
System, or its successor;
4. Be the central access and control point for Oklahoma’s this
state’s input, retrieval, and exchange of law enforcement
information in the National Crime Information Center and the
National Law Enforcement Telecommunication Telecommunications
System; and
5. Provide user agencies a data communication network, in order
to exchange and distribute law enforcement data rapidly, and
training in the use of the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Telecommunication Systems.
C. The statewide law enforcement data communications network
shall be a part of the Oklahoma Government Telecommunications
Network (OGTN) created in Section 34.23 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; provided, however, the Department of Public Safety may
continue to operate, maintain, and enhance the statewide law
enforcement data communications network; provided, however, the
Department of Public Safety shall submit all plans for the
enhancement of the statewide law enforcement communications network
to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for review and
approval. The Department of Public Safety shall participate with

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB675 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the Office of Management and Enterprise Services in joint efforts to
provide services for the OGTN.
D. All criminal justice agencies disseminating criminal history
information derived from the National Crime Information Center’s
criminal history file shall maintain a record of dissemination in
accordance with federal law as well as rules promulgated by the
National Crime Information Center and the Commissioner of Public
Safety.
E. The Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunication Systems
Division shall have the authority to audit state and local law
enforcement and criminal justice agencies to ensure compliance with
federal laws as well as rules of the Department of Public Safety
which pertain to the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunication
Systems.
F. Unless vehicle owner registration information is made
available to the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority through a registering
agency of this state or any other state, territory, district,
province, nation, or other jurisdiction that permits access to such
information upon request or by agreement, the Department of Public
Safety may provide the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority with vehicle
owner registration information within this state that is available
through the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunication Systems
network. This provision shall only apply for the purpose of toll

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB675 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

coll ection for vehicles identified by the Oklahoma Turnpike
Authority’s video toll collection system.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB675 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)